tests/commonwords.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../lin.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../lin.automorf.hfst
Tests:
  Commonwords:
    o<pr>: o
    mpé<cngcoo>: mpe
    nsɔ<unk>: nsɔ
    mpé<cngcoo>: Mpe
    nyɔ<unk>: nyɔ
    to<cngcoo>: to
    te<neg>: te
    mi<unk>: mi
    mpé<cngcoo>: mpé
    ete<unk>: ete
    wa<unk>: wa
    mwa<unk>: mwa
    lya<unk>: lya
    Nzambe<unk>: Nzambe
    nkema<unk>: nkema
    te<neg>: tɛ
    li<unk>: li
    esalemaki<unk>: esalemaki
    likolo<unk>: likolo
    té<unk>: té
